Nebraska, session 109, LB219.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB219 LB219
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-105, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-105 (1) For purposes of the Nebraska Criminal Code and any
statute passed by the Legislature after the date of passage of the code,
felonies are divided into ten classes which are distinguished from one
another by the following penalties which are authorized upon conviction:
Class I felony Death
Class IA felony Life imprisonment
Class IB felony Maximum—life imprisonment
Minimum—twenty years imprisonment
Class IC felony Maximum—fifty years imprisonment
Mandatory minimum—five years imprisonment
Class ID felony Maximum—fifty years imprisonment
Mandatory minimum—three years imprisonment
Class II felony Maximum—fifty years imprisonment
Minimum—one year imprisonment
Class IIA felony Maximum—twenty years imprisonment
Minimum—none
Class III felony Maximum—four years imprisonment and two years
post-release supervision or
twenty-five thousand dollars fine, or both
Minimum—none for imprisonment and none for
post-release supervision
Minimum—none for imprisonment and nine months
post-release supervision if imprisonment is imposed
Class IIIA felony Maximum—three years imprisonment
and eighteen months post-release supervision or
ten thousand dollars fine, or both
Minimum—none for imprisonment and none for
post-release supervision
-2-

LB219 LB219
2025 2025
Minimum—none for imprisonment and nine months
post-release supervision if imprisonment is imposed
Class IV felony Maximum—two years imprisonment and twelve
months post-release supervision or
ten thousand dollars fine, or both
Minimum—none for imprisonment and none for
post-release supervision
(2) All sentences for maximum terms of imprisonment for one year or
more for felonies shall be served in institutions under the jurisdiction
of the Department of Correctional Services. All sentences for maximum
terms of imprisonment of less than one year shall be served in the county
jail.
(3) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority granted in
sections 29-2221 and 29-2222 to increase sentences for habitual
criminals.
(4) A person convicted of a felony for which a mandatory minimum
sentence is prescribed shall not be eligible for probation.
(5) All sentences of post-release supervision shall be served under
the jurisdiction of the Office of Probation Administration and shall be
subject to conditions imposed pursuant to section 29-2262 and subject to
sanctions authorized pursuant to section 29-2266.02.
(6) Any person who is sentenced to imprisonment for a Class I, IA,
IB, IC, ID, II, or IIA felony and sentenced concurrently or consecutively
to imprisonment for a Class III, IIIA, or IV felony shall not be subject
to post-release supervision pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) Any person who is sentenced to imprisonment for a Class III,
IIIA, or IV felony committed prior to August 30, 2015, and sentenced
concurrently or consecutively to imprisonment for a Class III, IIIA, or
IV felony committed on or after August 30, 2015, shall not be subject to
post-release supervision pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(8) The changes made to the penalties for Class III, IIIA, and IV
-3-

LB219 LB219
2025 2025
felonies by Laws 2015, LB605, do not apply to any offense committed prior
to August 30, 2015, as provided in section 28-116.
Sec. 2. Original section 28-105, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-